Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8002
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide legal recognition to the professional practice of industrial hygiene so as to provide assurance to government, business, private entities, and the public that a person who represents himself or herself as a certified industrial hygienist or a person who or an entity which represents that he, she, or it provides industrial hygiene services by or under the direction and supervision of a certified industrial hygienist is actually such individual or directly employs such individuals having the qualifications stated in the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 2.